Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1623
Geologic storage project; consent and participation; authorized.

State agencies and political subdivisions are authorized to consent to and participate in a geologic storage project.

Laws 2021, LB650, § 23.
August 28, 2021